src/scripts/Uzbek/g2p.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2023 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

source g2pMap.foma
source fricativeJWords.foma
source phonemes.foma

define specialSymbol "~" | "^" ; 

define Word [lGrapheme | specialSymbol]+ ; 

define markYVowelLetters 
[..] -> "_y" || .#. | vLetter _ е , _ [ё|ю|я] ; 

define insertFricativeJMark [\gJ]* gJ [0:"_zh"] ?* ; 
define markFricativeJGrapheme 
[FricativeJWord .o. insertFricativeJMark] -> || .#. _ ; 

define mapGraphemes 
g2pMap @-> ; 

define CleanupSpecialSymbols 
specialSymbol -> 0 ; 

define checkGlottalStops 
"/gs" -> 0 || 
[.#. | [\Consonant] | "/gs"] _ , 
  _ [.#. | [\Vowel]] ; 

define BackToFrontI 
["/i?" : "/i0"] | ["/ii?" : "/ii0"] ; 

define DefaultIRule 
["/i?" : "/iy0" | "/ii?" : "/iiy0"] -> ; 

define InitialIRule 
BackToFrontI -> || .#. | "/gs" _ ; 

define IWithVowelRule 
BackToFrontI -> || Vowel _ , _ Vowel ; 

define IKRule 
BackToFrontI -> || _ pK ; 

define IYRule 
BackToFrontI -> || _ "/y" ; 

define SameConsonantsRule 
BackToFrontI -> || 
"/b" _ "/b", 
"/ch" _ "/ch", 
"/d" _ "/d", 
"/f" _ "/f", 
pG _ pG, 
"/gh" _ "/gh", 
"/h" _ "/h", 
"/j" _ "/j", 
pK _ pK, 
"/l" _ "/l", 
"/m" _ "/m", 
"/n" _ "/n", 
"/ng" _ "/ng", 
"/p" _ "/p", 
"/q" _ "/q", 
"/r" _ "/r", 
"/s" _ "/s", 
"/sh" _ "/sh", 
"/t" _ "/t", 
"/ts" _ "/ts", 
"/v" _ "/v", 
"/xh" _ "/xh", 
"/y" _ "/y", 
"/zh" _ "/zh" ; 

define IngRule 
BackToFrontI -> || _ "/ng" ; 

define HRule 
BackToFrontI -> || 
.#. [\Vowel]* "/h" _ ?* Vowel , 
.#. [\Vowel]* Vowel [\Vowel]* "/h" _ ?* Vowel ; 

define TaMaRule 
BackToFrontI -> 
|| .#. ["/t" | "/m"] "/a0" Consonant Consonant _ Consonant ; 

define GinaRule 
BackToFrontI -> || 
pG _ "/n" "/a0" .#. ; 

define YigRule 
BackToFrontI -> || 
"/y" _ pG ; 

define IRules 
InitialIRule 
.o. IWithVowelRule 
.o.  IKRule 
.o. IngRule 
.o. IYRule  
.o. HRule 
.o. SameConsonantsRule 
.o. TaMaRule  
.o. GinaRule  
.o. YigRule  
.o. DefaultIRule ; 

define MarkJFromDict 
"~" -> "_zh" || gJ _ ; 

define DefaultKGRule 
["/g?": "/g" | "/k?": "/k"] -> ; 

define FrontKGRule 
["/g?": "/gj" | "/k?": "/kj"] -> || _ FrontVowel | .#. ; 

define KGRules 
FrontKGRule 
.o. DefaultKGRule ; 

define g2pRules 
Word 
.o. MarkJFromDict 
.o. markFricativeJGrapheme 
.o. markYVowelLetters 
.o. mapGraphemes 
.o. CleanupSpecialSymbols 
.o. checkGlottalStops  
.o. IRules 
.o. KGRules ; 

regex g2pRules ; 
